Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8306
Human services, defined.

Human services means services that assist individuals in the conduct of daily living and includes the provision of food and shelter, a minimum amount of such assistance and personal care, and health-related services for individuals who are in need of a protected environment but who are otherwise able to manage normal activities of daily living.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 112.